Illinois, session 104th, HB2760.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Commerce and Economic 5Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois 6is amended by adding Section 1110 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 605/1110 new)8    Sec. 1110. Commission on Tourism.9    (a) A Commission on Tourism is hereby established to 10develop the statewide travel and tourism strategy described in 11subsection (c).12    (b) The Commission shall consist of the following members:13        (1) the Director of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 14    or the Director's designee, who shall serve as a cochair 15    of the Commission;16        (2) the Director of Natural Resources or the 17    Director's designee, who shall serve as a cochair of the 18    Commission;19        (3) the Director of Revenue or the Director's 20    designee;21        (4) the Secretary of Transportation or the Secretary's 22    designee;23        (5) the Director of Agriculture or the Director's   HB2760- 2 -LRB104 08248 HLH 18298 b1    designee;2        (6) the Director of Public Health or the Director's 3    designee;4        (7) the Chief Executive Officer of the Metropolitan 5    Pier Exposition Authority or the Chief Executive Officer's 6    designee;7        (8) the Director of Employment Security or the 8    Director's designee;9        (9) the Chairperson of the Illinois Gaming Board or 10    the Chairperson's designee;11        (10) the Executive Director of the Commission on 12    Equity and Inclusion or the Executive Director's designee; 13    and14        (11) the Chairman of the Illinois Arts Council or the 15    Chairman's designee.16    An individual designated under this subsection must be a 17senior-level official. 18    (c) The Commission shall develop a statewide travel and 19tourism strategy with recommendations for new policies and 20initiatives to promote domestic and international travel 21opportunities throughout Illinois with the goal of increasing 22the Illinois market share of international and interstate 23travel. The recommendations shall include, but shall not be 24limited to, strategies to promote visits to Illinois public 25lands, waters, shores, monuments, and other iconic 26destinations with the goal of expanding job creation in   HB2760- 3 -LRB104 08248 HLH 18298 b1Illinois. The Commission shall also consider recommendations 2to include in the statewide travel and tourism strategy to 3promote and expand travel and tourism opportunities in rural 4communities. In addition, the statewide travel and tourism 5strategy shall identify any opportunities to promote growth, 6including, but not limited to, fiscal policy, job training, 7and public-private partnerships.8    (d) The Commission shall meet at least once per year. 9Meetings may be called by one or both of the Commission's 10cochairs.11    (e) The Commission shall file a statewide travel and 12tourism strategy with the Governor and General Assembly by no 13later than 180 days after the effective date of this 14amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly and by no later 15than every January 1 thereafter.16    (f) Members of the Commission shall serve without 17compensation.18    (g) The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 19shall provide administrative and other support to the 20Commission.